Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1025.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding sections to read:§ 9720.9. Sentencing for hate-based intimidation.(a) Condition of probation.--In addition to any other penalties or fines imposed, a person who has been convicted of an offense under 18 Pa.C.S. § 2710 (relating to hate-based intimidation) may be required as a condition of probation to:(1) complete at least eight hours of educational instruction relating to the community against whom the person convicted has shown bias; or(2) complete at least eight hours of community service in benefit to the community against whom the person has shown 123456789101112131415161718 bias, provided that, from the perspective of the community affected, the community service will not increase the risk of further violence or intimidation against that community.(b) Condition of parole.--A person convicted of an offense under 18 Pa.C.S. § 2710 may be required as a condition of parole to:(1) complete at least eight hours of educational instruction relating to the community against whom the person convicted has shown bias; or(2) complete at least eight hours of community service in benefit to the community against whom the person has shown bias, provided that, from the perspective of the community affected, the community service will not increase the risk of further violence or intimidation against that community.§ 9739. Community impact statements.(a) Submittal and consideration.--Representatives of a community affected by a crime of which a defendant has been convicted shall have the right to submit a community impact statement prior to the imposition of a sentence on a defendant who was convicted of violating 18 Pa.C.S. § 2710(a) (relating to hate-based intimidation) . A court shall, when available, consider the community impact statement in determining the appropriate sentence to be imposed on the defendant. If more than one community is affected, representatives of each affected community may submit statements under this section.(b) Prohibition.--During the trial of a defendant accused of an offense, a court may not order the exclusion of an individual from the trial on the basis that the individual may, during the sentencing phase of the proceeding, do any of the following:(1) Make a community impact statement or present 20250SB1025PN1192 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 community impact information in relation to the sentence to be imposed on the defendant.(2) Testify as to the effect of the offense on the community.(c) Contents.--A community impact statement may include the following:(1) A summary of the harm, trauma or other physical or psychological effects suffered by the community or its members as a result of the defendant's crime.(2) A summary of the economic loss or damage suffered by the community or its members as a result of the defendant's crime.(3) The adverse social or economic effects of the defendant's crime on the community or its members, including individuals residing in and businesses operating in the community.(d) Submission of statement.--Upon receipt of a community impact statement by the court, the court shall immediately provide copies of the community impact statement to counsel for the prosecution and the defense.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Community." An informal or formal association or group of people living, working, attending school or attending worship services in the same judicial district or a contiguous judicial district and sharing common interests arising from a social, business, religious, governmental, scholastic or recreational association or interaction."Community impact statement." A written statement that 20250SB1025PN1192 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provides information about the financial, social, emotional and physical effects of a defendant's crime on a community.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1025PN1192 - 4 - 123